District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1235

Violations subject to penalties.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 36, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 3(8), 30 DCR 4289
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1835.